Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
90-275
Game and Parks Commission; convey
property to county of Sherman.

The Game and Parks Commission is authorized to convey to
the county of Sherman for public park purposes the following described real
estate, now known as Bowman State Recreation Area, situated in the county
of Sherman, in the State of Nebraska, to wit:

(1) A tract of
land in the northwest quarter of section 13, township 15 north, range 15 west
of the 6th principal meridian, in Sherman County, Nebraska, more particularly
described as follows: Commencing at a point on the line between sections 13
and 14, township 15 north, range 15 west of the 6th principal meridian, at
a point 33 feet south of the corner of sections 11, 12, 13, and 14, township
15 north, range 15 west of the 6th principal meridian, and running thence
east on a line parallel with the line between sections 12 and 13, township
15 north, range 15 west of the 6th principal meridian, and 33 feet distant,
995.94 feet, thence south 14 degrees, 15 minutes east 1252.35 feet, thence
south 37 degrees east 488.06 feet, thence south 59 degrees, 45 minutes east
132.99 feet, thence south 86 degrees west 974.16 feet to the left bank of
the Middle Loup River, thence in a northwesterly direction along the left
bank of the stream, 1201.86 feet to a point on the line between sections 13
and 14 aforesaid 917.40 feet south of said corner of sections 11, 12, 13,
and 14, thence north on the line between sections 13 and 14, 884.40 feet to
the point of beginning, containing 43.06 acres, more or less; and

(2) A tract of
land in the northwest quarter of section 13, township 15 north, range 15 west
of the 6th principal meridian, in Sherman County, Nebraska, more particularly
described as follows: Commencing at the east quarter corner of said section
13, township 15 north, range 15 west of the 6th principal meridian; thence
southerly on said section line a distance of 910.56 feet; thence northwesterly
with a deflection angle of 117 degrees, 42 minutes, a distance of 3492.39
feet to the point of beginning, this point of beginning being marked by an
iron stake and being the southeast corner of a tract of land conveyed to the
State of Nebraska by warranty deed from John Haesler and Bertha Haesler, husband
and wife, dated October 30, 1930, and recorded April 29, 1931, in Book 43
at Page 151 of Deed Records; thence southwesterly with a bearing of south
46 degrees, 10 minutes, west 699.13 feet to a point on the left bank of the
Middle Loup River; thence northwesterly along the left bank of said Middle
Loup River with a bearing of north 46 degrees, 0 minutes, west 602.55 feet;
thence easterly, on the south line of said tract, on a bearing north 86 degrees,
0 minutes, east a distance of 940 feet to the point of beginning; containing
4.83 acres, more or less.

Laws 2011, LB207, § 1.